Utah statutes.
77-24-5.   Property seized from person -- Duplicate receipts.

(1)  When tangible or intangible property is seized with or without a warrant, the peace officer seizing it shall at the time deliver a receipt to the person from whom it is taken and file a duplicate in the office of the agency employing the officer.

(2)  If the property is seized for forfeiture, a written notice pursuant to Section 24-1-4 may serve as the receipt, and a duplicate filed in the office of the agency employing the officer.

(3)  If custody of the property is transferred to another police agency or the property is placed in evidence, a copy of the receipt shall accompany it until disposition of the property is made in accordance with applicable law.

